src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
zweite:zweite A_zweite__adj_ord ;
vierte:vierte A_zweite__adj_ord ;
sechste:sechste A_zweite__adj_ord ;
achte:achte A_zweite__adj_ord ;
zehnte:zehnte A_zweite__adj_ord ;
zwölfte:zwölfte A_zweite__adj_ord ;
sechzehnte:sechzehnte A_zweite__adj_ord ;
zwanzigste:zwanzigste A_zweite__adj_ord ;
vierundzwanzigste:vierundzwanzigste A_zweite__adj_ord ;
achtundzwanzigste:achtundzwanzigste A_zweite__adj_ord ;
Hundertste:Hundertste A_zweite__adj_ord ;
ander:ander A_nipt__adj ;
allerbest:allerbest A_allerbest__adj ;
allererst:allererst A_allerbest__adj ;
allergrößt:allergrößt A_allerbest__adj ;
allerhand:allerhand A_allerhand__adj ;
allerhöchst:allerhöchst A_allerbest__adj ;
allerletzt:allerletzt A_allerbest__adj ;
allermeist:allermeist A_allerbest__adj ;
allerwenigst:allerwenigst A_allerbest__adj ;
alt:alt A_/alt__adj ;
angst:angst A_allerhand__adj ;
anstehend:anstehend A_abendfüllend__adj ;
arisch:arisch A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
arm:arm A_/arg__adj ;!A_/arm__adj ;
aufgeräumt:aufgeräumt A_abgebrannt__adj ;
außereuropäisch:außer#europäisch A_/europäisch__adj ;
bange:bange A_dröge__adj ;
bass:bass A_bass__adj ;
begeisternd:begeisternd A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
beschädigt:beschädigt A_abendfüllend__adj ;
besonder:besonder A_abgebrannt__adj ;
besondere:besondere A_dröge__adj ;
binnen:binnen A_allerhand__adj ;
böse:böse A_dröge__adj ;
brutto:brutto A_allerhand__adj ;
bündig:bündig A_abhold__adj ;
charmant:charmant A_abgebrannt__adj ;
dufte:dufte A_dröge__adj ;
dumm:dumm A_/arg__adj ;!A_d/umm__adj ;
dutzend:dutzend A_abendfüllend__adj ;
edel:edel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
empirisch:empirisch A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
erbarmungslos:erbarmungslos A_abgebrannt__adj ;
essentiell:essentiell A_abendfüllend__adj ;
europäisch:europäisch A_/europäisch__adj ;
faktisch:faktisch A_abhold__adj ;
fidel:fidel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
fremd:fremd A_abgebrannt__adj ;
gelinde:gelinde A_dröge__adj ;
gering:gering A_abhold__adj ;
geübt:geübt A_abgebrannt__adj ;
gleichaltrig:gleichaltrig A_abendfüllend__adj ;
grausig:grausig A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
grob:grob A_/arg__adj ;!A_gr/ob__adj ;
gut:gut A_/gut__adj ;
heikel:heikel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
heimwehkrank:heim#weh#krank A_/arg__adj ;!A_kr/ank__adj ;
hügelig:hügelig A_abhold__adj ;
indiskutabel:indiskutabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
jahrhundertealt:jahr#hunderte#alt A_/alt__adj ;
kalt:kalt A_/alt__adj ;
kategorisch:kategorisch A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
klug:klug A_/arg__adj ;!
komfortabel:komfortabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
köpfig:köpfig A_abendfüllend__adj ;
krass:krass A_abgebrannt__adj ;
krumm:krumm A_/arg__adj ;!A_d/umm__adj ;
leidlich:leidlich A_abhold__adj ;
leise:leise A_dröge__adj ;
leistungsstark:leistungs#stark A_/arg__adj ;!A_st/ark__adj ;
marode:marode A_dröge__adj ;
miserabel:miserabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
montenegrinisch:montenegrinisch A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
naheliegend:naheliegend A_abhold__adj ;
natur:natur A_allerhand__adj ;
neuralgisch:neuralgisch A_abendfüllend__adj ;
obere:obere A_dröge__adj ;
passabel:passabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
prägnant:prägnant A_abgebrannt__adj ;
prima:prima A_allerhand__adj ;
profitabel:profitabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
punktuell:punktuell A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
rabiat:rabiat A_abhold__adj ;
rechts:rechts A_allerhand__adj ;
religiöse:religiöse A_dröge__adj ;
scharf:scharf A_/arg__adj ;!A_sch/arf__adj ;
schlaflos:schlaflos A_abendfüllend__adj ;
schuld:schuld A_allerhand__adj ;
schwammig:schwammig A_abhold__adj ;
seekrank:see#krank A_/arg__adj ;!A_/arg__adj ;!A_kr/ank__adj ;
seicht:seicht A_abgebrannt__adj ;
simpel:simpel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
slowakisch:slowakisch A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
treuherzig:treuherzig A_abhold__adj ;
triumphal:triumphal A_abendfüllend__adj ;
typisch:typisch A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
übernächst:übernächst A_allerbest__adj ;
umfassend:umfassend A_allerhand__adj ;
unbewusst:unbewusst A_abgebrannt__adj ;
unverschämt:unverschämt A_abhold__adj ;
unverwechselbar:unverwechselbar A_abendfüllend__adj ;
veritabel:veritabel A_teu/er__adj ;!A_akzeptab/el__adj ;
verzweigt:verzweigt A_abgebrannt__adj ;
viel:viel A_/viel__adj ;
vielfältig:vielfältig A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
vorwiegend:vorwiegend A_abendfüllend__adj ;
wahrscheinlich:wahrscheinlich A_abhold__adj ;
warm:warm A_/arg__adj ;!A_/arm__adj ;
weise:weise A_dröge__adj ;
zuversichtlich:zuversichtlich A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
in% Betrieb:in% Betrieb A_allerhand__adj ;
